Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-114
Disbarment and contempt cases; costs.

In all proceedings instituted for the suspension, censure, or disbarment of attorneys at law, and in all contempt proceedings, the court costs shall be taxed as the court shall deem equitable.

Laws 1911, c. 170, § 1, p. 547;

R.S.1913, §§ 278, 279;

C.S.1922, § 273;

C.S.1929, § 7-114;

R.S.1943, § 7-114;

Laws 1955, c. 8, § 1, p. 72.

Informers acting in good faith are not liable for costs. Morton v. Watson, 60 Neb. 672, 84 N.W. 91 (1900).

Provision for taxation of costs applies to disbarment and contempt proceedings. Niklaus v. Simmons, 196 F.Supp. 691 (D. Neb. 1961).